District of Columbia statutes.
47-859.04

Tax abatements for new residential developments — Abatement caps.

The Mayor may approve an amount not to exceed $5 million annually in tax abatements under § 47-859.03, not to exceed $50 million in the aggregate.

July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-10, § 2(b), 56 DCR 3598
This section is referenced in § 47-859.02.